src/kom-lex.txt
LEXICON ADV-SPAT-TER
+Adv+Spat+Ter:%>ӧдз COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-VTER
+V+Der/тӧдз+Adv+Temp+Ter:%>тӧдз K ;

! Adverbs with ready morphology
LEXICON ADV-IS_APRELA
+Adv+Apr+Ela: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_APRILL
+Adv+Apr+Ill: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_APRINE
+Adv+Apr+Ine: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_APR
+Adv+Apr: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_EGR
+Adv+Egr: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_ELA
+Adv+Ela: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_ILL
+Adv+Ill: IllCompar ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_INE
+Adv+Ine: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_PROL
+Adv+Prol: K ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_TER
+Adv+Ter: K ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_TRA
+Adv+Tra: K ;


LEXICON EndConj
+CC: # ;

LEXICON EndPart
+Pcle: # ;

LEXICON PcleIntens
+Pcle+Intens: # ;

LEXICON EndInterj
+Interj: # ;

LEXICON EndNeg 
+CC+Neg: # ; ! ни

LEXICON EndQST
+Qst: # ;

LEXICON ONOM-End
+Onom: # ;

LEXICON DESCR-End
+Descr: # ;



! ======= !
! Clitics !
! ======= !

LEXICON K
                 # ; 
+Clt+Clt/а:%>%-а # ;
+Clt+Clt/ӧ:%>%-ӧ # ;
+Clt+Clt/тӧ:%>тӧ # ;
+Clt+Clt/сӧ:%>сӧ # ;


! List of spurious lexica
! These should be fixed.


LEXICON ADV-SUPERL
+Adv+Superl: # ;

! 2012-02-11
! This should have the following case forms pointing toward it:
! ine, ill, ela, apr, aprela, aprill, aprine
LEXICON SPAT-COMPARATIVE
 COMPARATIVE ;
 PredMonLex-Spat-Add-Morphology ; !


LEXICON COMPARATIVE
                        K ;
+Der/джык+Compar:%>джык K ;
+Der/моз:%>моз K ;
+Der/кодь:%>кодь K ;

LEXICON TESTCOMP

+CmpTest: # ;



! TODO: Integrate this in xml-files in working…

LEXICON SUBSTANDARDS 
коръя+Err/Sub:корья Noun1 ;

LEXICON TESTINGTESTING
син TESTCOMP ;
пач TESTCOMP ;
сё TESTCOMP ;
мый TESTCOMP ;
Вылыс TESTCOMP ;
пель TESTCOMP ;
Ичӧт TESTCOMP ;
уна TESTCOMP ;
сьӧлӧм TESTCOMP ;
мӧд TESTCOMP ;
тыр TESTCOMP ;
сой TESTCOMP ;
нем TESTCOMP ;
Дзоля TESTCOMP ;
Улыс TESTCOMP ;
туй TESTCOMP ;
ныр TESTCOMP ;
кыв TESTCOMP ;
дас TESTCOMP ;
на TESTCOMP ;
нёль TESTCOMP ;
мукӧд TESTCOMP ;
кок TESTCOMP ;
сьӧд TESTCOMP ;
пу TESTCOMP ;
тӧв TESTCOMP ;
ӧти TESTCOMP ;
некымын TESTCOMP ;
пинь TESTCOMP ;
куим TESTCOMP ;
лым TESTCOMP ;
кык TESTCOMP ;
мӧс TESTCOMP ;
ӧшинь TESTCOMP ;
ӧнія TESTCOMP ;
пызан TESTCOMP ;
кымын TESTCOMP ;
сикт TESTCOMP ;
нянь TESTCOMP ;
миян TESTCOMP ;
сир TESTCOMP ;
пыш TESTCOMP ;
пес TESTCOMP ;
нюр TESTCOMP ;
челядь TESTCOMP ;
сизим TESTCOMP ;
серам TESTCOMP ;
татшӧм TESTCOMP ;
потшӧс TESTCOMP ;
сапӧг TESTCOMP ;
пос TESTCOMP ;
кер TESTCOMP ;
кӧрт TESTCOMP ;
ӧкмыс TESTCOMP ;
талунъя TESTCOMP ;
кымынкӧ TESTCOMP ;
сёрни TESTCOMP ;
недыр TESTCOMP ;
паччӧр TESTCOMP ;
сера TESTCOMP ;
олан TESTCOMP ;
мукӧддырся TESTCOMP ;
нинӧм TESTCOMP ;
пыж TESTCOMP ;
няр TESTCOMP ;
шы TESTCOMP ;
ув TESTCOMP ;
ки TESTCOMP ;
чӧв TESTCOMP ;
вӧр TESTCOMP ;
ӧдзӧс TESTCOMP ;
пывсян TESTCOMP ;
сюрса TESTCOMP ;
пыдди TESTCOMP ;
парма TESTCOMP ;
мыльк TESTCOMP ;
Еджыд TESTCOMP ;
сэтшӧм TESTCOMP ;
пидзӧс TESTCOMP ;
шома TESTCOMP ;
смек TESTCOMP ;
пурт TESTCOMP ;
пиня TESTCOMP ;
кузь TESTCOMP ;
морӧс TESTCOMP ;
сён TESTCOMP ;
сюн TESTCOMP ;
сос TESTCOMP ;
пыр TESTCOMP ;
пув TESTCOMP ;
пом TESTCOMP ;
нэм TESTCOMP ;
мыр TESTCOMP ;
лёк TESTCOMP ;
Лёк TESTCOMP ;
Кос TESTCOMP ;
скӧт TESTCOMP ;
ыж TESTCOMP ;
ур TESTCOMP ;
сю TESTCOMP ;
не TESTCOMP ;
пӧлать TESTCOMP ;
йӧла TESTCOMP ;
кӧр TESTCOMP ;
мырдысьӧн TESTCOMP ;
платтьӧ TESTCOMP ;
Микайлӧ TESTCOMP ;
помысь TESTCOMP ;
печкан TESTCOMP ;
паметь TESTCOMP ;
недель TESTCOMP ;
мывкыд TESTCOMP ;
кукань TESTCOMP ;
ыджыд TESTCOMP ;
чипан TESTCOMP ;
сэкся TESTCOMP ;
синва TESTCOMP ;
сарай TESTCOMP ;
сакар TESTCOMP ;
рыныш TESTCOMP ;
регыд TESTCOMP ;
пырыс TESTCOMP ;
порог TESTCOMP ;
писти TESTCOMP ;
квайт TESTCOMP ;
разнӧй TESTCOMP ;
мырдӧн TESTCOMP ;
шонді TESTCOMP ;
чери TESTCOMP ;
тюни TESTCOMP ;
став TESTCOMP ;
садь TESTCOMP ;
няйт TESTCOMP ;
мырд TESTCOMP ;
мудз TESTCOMP ;
морт TESTCOMP ;
кутш TESTCOMP ;
коса TESTCOMP ;
узьӧм TESTCOMP ;
сэтӧр TESTCOMP ;
курӧг TESTCOMP ;
пикӧ TESTCOMP ;
эсы TESTCOMP ;
сям TESTCOMP ;
сэн TESTCOMP ;
сэк TESTCOMP ;
сус TESTCOMP ;
пуд TESTCOMP ;
пон TESTCOMP ;
ныв TESTCOMP ;
мир TESTCOMP ;
лун TESTCOMP ;
кай TESTCOMP ;
Уль TESTCOMP ;
Вой TESTCOMP ;
Важ TESTCOMP ;
су TESTCOMP ;
ош TESTCOMP ;
оз TESTCOMP ;
кӧдзан TESTCOMP ;
сӧдз TESTCOMP ;
пӧлӧс TESTCOMP ;
сӧз TESTCOMP ;
сідз TESTCOMP ;
ӧнтайся TESTCOMP ;
ӧтарӧ TESTCOMP ;
ӧтар TESTCOMP ;
ӧбед TESTCOMP ;
ӧтмӧдар TESTCOMP ;
увтыртана TESTCOMP ;
недельысь TESTCOMP ;
кодзувкот TESTCOMP ;
повзьыштӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
унйылысь TESTCOMP ;
тыдалана TESTCOMP ;
печласян TESTCOMP ;
песласян TESTCOMP ;
пемыдысь TESTCOMP ;
пасьтала TESTCOMP ;
отависьт TESTCOMP ;
няръясян TESTCOMP ;
Каменная TESTCOMP ;
тэрмасьӧм TESTCOMP ;
колскылӧ TESTCOMP ;
уджалан TESTCOMP ;
сыладор TESTCOMP ;
стенысь TESTCOMP ;
сиктысь TESTCOMP ;
свадьба TESTCOMP ;
посводз TESTCOMP ;
площадь TESTCOMP ;
пельысь TESTCOMP ;
пельпом TESTCOMP ;
пачводз TESTCOMP ;
парбань TESTCOMP ;
нскымын TESTCOMP ;
мойдкыв TESTCOMP ;
кассяна TESTCOMP ;
зильган TESTCOMP ;
дзуртан TESTCOMP ;
Путшкым TESTCOMP ;
Куратов TESTCOMP ;
Дженьыд TESTCOMP ;
Асанька TESTCOMP ;
шмонитӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
родыштӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
падъялӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
нюммунӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
тыдавмӧн TESTCOMP ;
пелыштӧм TESTCOMP ;
нюмсерӧн TESTCOMP ;
таланьӧ TESTCOMP ;
некутшӧ TESTCOMP ;
нарошнӧ TESTCOMP ;
кузьта-пасьта TESTCOMP ;
шыльыд TESTCOMP ;
шемела TESTCOMP ;
черань TESTCOMP ;
увлань TESTCOMP ;
увйысь TESTCOMP ;
тупъюр TESTCOMP ;
телега TESTCOMP ;
сьылан TESTCOMP ;
сьывны TESTCOMP ;
судзан TESTCOMP ;
сувтса TESTCOMP ;
страда TESTCOMP ;
стекло TESTCOMP ;
снитки TESTCOMP ;
синкым TESTCOMP ;
секунд TESTCOMP ;
сартас TESTCOMP ;
саридз TESTCOMP ;
прасла TESTCOMP ;
позяна TESTCOMP ;
пласьт TESTCOMP ;
пищаль TESTCOMP ;
пестер TESTCOMP ;
пелысь TESTCOMP ;
нэмысь TESTCOMP ;
мыссян TESTCOMP ;
муртса TESTCOMP ;
моздор TESTCOMP ;
кузяла TESTCOMP ;
кузьта TESTCOMP ;
кринча TESTCOMP ;
Чикшин TESTCOMP ;
Сыктыв TESTCOMP ;
Сувтса TESTCOMP ;
Окунев TESTCOMP ;
Кывтыд TESTCOMP ;
Курмыш TESTCOMP ;
Касьян TESTCOMP ;
Войвож TESTCOMP ;
Буткан TESTCOMP ;
повзьӧдчысь TESTCOMP ;
повзьӧдана TESTCOMP ;
садьмӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
уразнӧй TESTCOMP ;
судзмӧн TESTCOMP ;
садьтӧг TESTCOMP ;
позьтӧм TESTCOMP ;
повзьӧм TESTCOMP ;
паныдӧн TESTCOMP ;
дзодзӧг TESTCOMP ;
Высокӧй TESTCOMP ;
чесьтӧ TESTCOMP ;
тасьті TESTCOMP ;
рытыв-войладор TESTCOMP ;
эмбур TESTCOMP ;
шапка TESTCOMP ;
увпыш TESTCOMP ;
турун TESTCOMP ;
сыысь TESTCOMP ;
сутки TESTCOMP ;
сумка TESTCOMP ;
судта TESTCOMP ;
столб TESTCOMP ;
смоль TESTCOMP ;
слуда TESTCOMP ;
сзкся TESTCOMP ;
сетан TESTCOMP ;
семья TESTCOMP ;
сапог TESTCOMP ;
рытыв TESTCOMP ;
рытъя TESTCOMP ;
пуысь TESTCOMP ;
пошта TESTCOMP ;
порсь TESTCOMP ;
полой TESTCOMP ;
подув TESTCOMP ;
петан TESTCOMP ;
пелыс TESTCOMP ;
паныд TESTCOMP ;
окота TESTCOMP ;
носки TESTCOMP ;
некод TESTCOMP ;
мышку TESTCOMP ;
мусюр TESTCOMP ;
лямпа TESTCOMP ;
лигыш TESTCOMP ;
ладан TESTCOMP ;
кызта TESTCOMP ;
кыдъя TESTCOMP ;
колян TESTCOMP ;
колля TESTCOMP ;
керка TESTCOMP ;
карта TESTCOMP ;
джыдж TESTCOMP ;
ваджа TESTCOMP ;
бруль TESTCOMP ;
адама TESTCOMP ;
Чилим TESTCOMP ;
Увдор TESTCOMP ;
Табъя TESTCOMP ;
Сосья TESTCOMP ;
Савин TESTCOMP ;
Куръя TESTCOMP ;
Коржа TESTCOMP ;
Кодач TESTCOMP ;
Катыд TESTCOMP ;
Джиян TESTCOMP ;
Ворга TESTCOMP ;
Винла TESTCOMP ;
Вепра TESTCOMP ;
мыйкӧдыра TESTCOMP ;
пидзӧсе TESTCOMP ;
сьылӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
сотчӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
Кедрӧвӧй TESTCOMP ;
чеччӧм TESTCOMP ;
уджйӧз TESTCOMP ;
торйӧн TESTCOMP ;
татчӧс TESTCOMP ;
сотчӧм TESTCOMP ;
рудзӧг TESTCOMP ;
питшӧг TESTCOMP ;
пельӧс TESTCOMP ;
орччӧн TESTCOMP ;
кольӧм TESTCOMP ;
кокчӧр TESTCOMP ;
дозмӧр TESTCOMP ;
Мутнӧй TESTCOMP ;
синмӧ TESTCOMP ;
пиньӧ TESTCOMP ;
мыйкӧ TESTCOMP ;
косьӧ TESTCOMP ;
сьылі TESTCOMP ;
этша TESTCOMP ;
ывла TESTCOMP ;
шков TESTCOMP ;
чуня TESTCOMP ;
ужын TESTCOMP ;
тужа TESTCOMP ;
труч TESTCOMP ;
сэзь TESTCOMP ;
сутш TESTCOMP ;
стен TESTCOMP ;
содз TESTCOMP ;
рутш TESTCOMP ;
рана TESTCOMP ;
пызь TESTCOMP ;
плаш TESTCOMP ;
пипу TESTCOMP ;
пеша TESTCOMP ;
пась TESTCOMP ;
пань TESTCOMP ;
оран TESTCOMP ;
омра TESTCOMP ;
нёнь TESTCOMP ;
нярс TESTCOMP ;
нюрс TESTCOMP ;
ньыв TESTCOMP ;
низь TESTCOMP ;
мыла TESTCOMP ;
мыжа TESTCOMP ;
мурч TESTCOMP ;
мода TESTCOMP ;
лыжи TESTCOMP ;
лист TESTCOMP ;
кыдз TESTCOMP ;
кудз TESTCOMP ;
кага TESTCOMP ;
град TESTCOMP ;
Тшая TESTCOMP ;
Рысь TESTCOMP ;
Кони TESTCOMP ;
мукӧддырйи TESTCOMP ;
сикӧтш TESTCOMP ;
сёйӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
полӧмӧн TESTCOMP ;
нинӧмӧ TESTCOMP ;
сёйӧм TESTCOMP ;
подӧн TESTCOMP ;
петӧм TESTCOMP ;
мылӧд TESTCOMP ;
мунӧм TESTCOMP ;
кымӧр TESTCOMP ;
немӧ TESTCOMP ;
лудік TESTCOMP ;
эта TESTCOMP ;
шыр TESTCOMP ;
шом TESTCOMP ;
чуп TESTCOMP ;
чис TESTCOMP ;
чай TESTCOMP ;
туч TESTCOMP ;
таз TESTCOMP ;
сюр TESTCOMP ;
сов TESTCOMP ;
сап TESTCOMP ;
руч TESTCOMP ;
рок TESTCOMP ;
пур TESTCOMP ;
поз TESTCOMP ;
пев TESTCOMP ;
нюм TESTCOMP ;
ниа TESTCOMP ;
мыш TESTCOMP ;
мам TESTCOMP ;
лэч TESTCOMP ;
лыа TESTCOMP ;
кук TESTCOMP ;
зэр TESTCOMP ;
жов TESTCOMP ;
вом TESTCOMP ;
Чуб TESTCOMP ;
Нем TESTCOMP ;
Лек TESTCOMP ;
Бур TESTCOMP ;
стӧчджыка TESTCOMP ;
сьӧрсьӧн-бӧрсьӧн TESTCOMP ;
стӧкан TESTCOMP ;
сьӧрт TESTCOMP ;
прӧст TESTCOMP ;
олӧм TESTCOMP ;
ыб TESTCOMP ;
си TESTCOMP ;
ни TESTCOMP ;
ас TESTCOMP ;
пӧпуттьӧ TESTCOMP ;
мӧдджык TESTCOMP ;
рӧштво TESTCOMP ;
мӧдысь TESTCOMP ;
Йӧртым TESTCOMP ;
рӧкыд TESTCOMP ;
кӧрув TESTCOMP ;
Сӧкся TESTCOMP ;
тӧлк TESTCOMP ;
лӧма TESTCOMP ;
гӧрд TESTCOMP ;
Вӧль TESTCOMP ;
пӧлӧн TESTCOMP ;
кӧрӧ TESTCOMP ;
рӧз TESTCOMP ;
нӧш TESTCOMP ;
кӧш TESTCOMP ;
йӧр TESTCOMP ;
Шӧрвыв TESTCOMP ;
тітш TESTCOMP ;
ӧтвесьтын TESTCOMP ;
ӧтпырйӧн TESTCOMP ;
ӧтлаын TESTCOMP ;
ӧмидз TESTCOMP ;
ӧтка TESTCOMP ;
ӧлӧдана TESTCOMP ;
ӧні TESTCOMP ;
Мушӧр TESTCOMP ;
радиоактив TESTCOMP ;
